North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 23. State Education Assistance.
§§ 116-209.64 through 116-209.69.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 4. Transforming Principal Preparation Grant Program.

§§ 116-209.70 through 116-209.74.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-60, s. 1(i), effective July 1, 2021.

History.

G.S. 116-209.70

; 2018-5, s. 10A.4(b); 2018-145, s. 2(a); 2019-60, ss. 1(a), (e), (i); repealed by Session Laws 2019-60, s. 1(i), effective July 1, 2021. G.S. 116-209.71; 2018-145, s. 2(a); 2019-60, s. 1(a), (i); repealed by Session Laws 2019-60, s. 1(i), effective July 1, 2021. G.S. 116-209.72; 2018-5, s. 10A.4(b); 2018-145, s. 2(a); 2019-60, s. 1(a), (i); repealed by Session Laws 2019-60, s. 1(i), effective July 1, 2021. G.S. 116-209.73; 2018-5, s. 10A.4(b); 2018-145, s. 2(a); 2019-60, s. 1(a), (f), (i); repealed by Session Laws 2019-60, s. 1(i), effective July 1, 2021. G.S. 116-209.74; 2018-5, s. 10A.4(b); 2018-145, s. 2(a); 2019-60, s. 1(a), (i); repealed by Session Laws 2019-60, s. 1(i), effective July 1, 2021.

Cross References.

As to current North Carolina Principal Fellows and Transforming Principal Preparation Program, see

G.S. 116-74.41

et seq.

§ 116-209.75.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-60, s. 1(a), effective June 27, 2019.

History.

2018-145, s. 2(a); repealed by 2019-60, s. 1(a), effective June 30, 2019.

§§ 116-209.76,
116-209.77.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2019-60, s. 1(i), effective July 1, 2021.

History.

G.S. 116-209.76

; 2019-60, s. 1(g), (i); repealed by Session Laws 2019-60, s. 1(i), effective July 1, 2021. G.S. 116-209.77; 2019-60, s. 1(g), (i).

§§ 116-209.78,
116-209.79.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 5.
The North Carolina Need-Based Scholarship for Public Colleges and Universities.

§ 116-209.80.
Definitions.

The following definitions apply to this Part:

Eligible postsecondary institution. — A school that is:

A constituent institution of The University of North Carolina as defined in

G.S. 116-2(4)

.

A community college as defined in

G.S. 115D-2(2)

.

Matriculated status. — Being recognized as a student in a defined program of study leading to a degree, diploma, or certificate at an eligible postsecondary institution.

Program. — The North Carolina Need-Based Scholarship Program for Public Colleges and Universities.

Reserve Fund. — Scholarship Reserve Fund for Public Colleges and Universities.

Scholarship. — A scholarship for education awarded under this Part.

Title IV. — Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended, 20 U.S.C. § 1070, et seq.

History.

2021-180, s. 8A.2(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(
l
), made this Part, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(a), effective January 1, 2022, and applicable to scholarships awarded beginning with the 2023-2024 academic year.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 116-209.81.
Eligibility requirements for a scholarship.

In order to be eligible to receive a scholarship under this Part, a student seeking a degree, diploma, or certificate at an eligible postsecondary institution must meet all of the following requirements:

Qualify as a resident for tuition purposes under the criteria set forth in

G.S. 116-143.1

and in accordance with the coordinated and centralized residency determination process administered by the Authority.

Meet enrollment standards by being admitted, enrolled, and classified as an undergraduate student in a matriculated status at an eligible postsecondary institution. The President of The University of North Carolina and the President of the North Carolina Community College System may jointly agree to additional enrollment standards for the Program.

Submit a Free Application for Federal Student Aid (FAFSA) and demonstrate need according to federal methodology in Title IV of the Higher Education Act of 1965, as amended, 20 U.S.C. § 1070, et seq.

In addition to the criteria set forth in subsection (a) of this section, in order for a student to continue to be eligible for a scholarship for the student’s second and subsequent academic years, the student must meet achievement standards by maintaining satisfactory academic progress in a course of study in accordance with the standards and practices used for federal Title IV programs by the eligible postsecondary institution in which the student is enrolled.

History.

2021-180, s. 8A.2(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(
l
), made this Part, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(a), effective January 1, 2022, and applicable to scholarships awarded beginning with the 2023-2024 academic year.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 116-209.82.
Semester limitation on eligibility for scholarship.

Except as otherwise provided by subsection (c) of this section, a student matriculating at a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina shall not receive a scholarship for more than 10 full-time academic semesters, or its equivalent if enrolled part-time, unless the student is enrolled in a program officially designated by the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina as a five-year degree program. If a student is enrolled in such a five-year degree program, then the student shall not receive a scholarship for more than 12 full-time academic semesters or the equivalent if enrolled part-time.

Except as otherwise provided by subsection (c) of this section, a student shall not receive a scholarship for more than six full-time academic semesters, or the equivalent if enrolled part-time, while matriculating at a community college.

Upon application by a student, the applicable eligible postsecondary institution may grant a waiver to the student who may then receive a scholarship for the equivalent of one additional full-time academic semester if the student demonstrates that any of the following have substantially disrupted or interrupted the student’s pursuit of a degree, diploma, or certificate: (i) a military service obligation, (ii) serious medical debilitation, (iii) a short-term or long-term disability, or (iv) other extraordinary hardship. The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina or the State Board of Community Colleges, as appropriate, shall establish policies and procedures to implement the waiver provided by this subsection.

History.

2021-180, s. 8A.2(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(
l
), made this Part, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(a), effective January 1, 2022, and applicable to scholarships awarded beginning with the 2023-2024 academic year.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 116-209.83.
Scholarship amounts; adjustment of scholarship amounts.

Scholarship Amounts. — Subject to the availability of funds in the Scholarship Reserve Fund for Public Colleges and Universities, as provided in

G.S. 116-209.85

, a scholarship awarded under this Part to a student at an eligible postsecondary institution shall be based upon a consolidated payment schedule established jointly by the President of The University of North Carolina and the President of the North Carolina Community College System, in consultation with the Authority. The payment schedule shall clearly define award amounts by type of eligible postsecondary institution and student financial need as defined by federal methodology. The Authority shall publish the payment schedule for the Program in an easily accessible and understandable format. Once published, a payment schedule shall remain in effect unless otherwise agreed by the President of The University of North Carolina and the President of the North Carolina Community College System.

Availability of Scholarships. — Subject to the payment schedule described in subsection (a) of this section, the Authority shall have the power to determine the actual scholarship amounts disbursed to students in any given year based on the amount of funds available in the Scholarship Reserve Fund for Public Colleges and Universities created pursuant to

G.S. 116-209.85

. If the funds available are not sufficient to fully fund the scholarships as set forth in the payment schedule established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the Authority, in consultation with the President of The University of North Carolina and the President of the North Carolina Community College System, shall adjust the distribution of the funds as necessary.

History.

2021-180, s. 8A.2(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(
l
), made this Part, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(a), effective January 1, 2022, and applicable to scholarships awarded beginning with the 2023-2024 academic year.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 116-209.84.
Scholarship administration; reporting requirements.

The scholarships provided for in this Part shall be administered by the Authority under rules adopted by the Authority in accordance with the provisions of this Part.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the Authority shall conduct periodic evaluations of expenditures under the Program administered by the Authority to determine if allocations are utilized to ensure access to eligible postsecondary institutions and to meet the goals of respective programs. The authority may make recommendations of the redistribution of funds to the President of The University of North Carolina and the President of the North Carolina Community College System, who then may jointly authorize redistribution of funds for a particular fiscal year.

The Authority shall report no later than December 1, 2024, and annually thereafter to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee. The report shall contain, for the previous academic year, the dollar amount of awards disbursed, the number of eligible students receiving funds, and a breakdown of the eligible postsecondary institutions that received the funds.

Scholarship funds unexpended shall remain available for future scholarships to be awarded under this Part.

History.

2021-180, s. 8A.2(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(
l
), made this Part, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(a), effective January 1, 2022, and applicable to scholarships awarded beginning with the 2023-2024 academic year.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 116-209.85.
Scholarship Reserve Fund for Public Colleges and Universities.

There is established the Scholarship Reserve Fund for Public Colleges and Universities as a reserve consisting of the following monies:

Funds appropriated by the General Assembly for the Program from the Education Lottery Fund in the Current Operations Appropriations Act for a fiscal year for education-related purposes in accordance with

G.S. 18C-164

.

Funds appropriated by the General Assembly for the Program from the Escheat Fund in the Current Operations Appropriations Act for a fiscal year that is distributed annually on or before August 15 to the Authority pursuant to

G.S. 116B-7(a)

.

Funds appropriated by the General Assembly for the Program from the General Fund in the Current Operations Appropriations Act for a fiscal year.

All returned scholarship funds from the Program.

All interest earned on these funds.

The Authority shall create two reserves within the Reserve Fund as follows: The University of North Carolina (UNC Reserve) and the North Carolina Community College System (CC Reserve) from monies in the Reserve Fund. The funds in the reserves shall be used for scholarships for the academic year that begins in the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the allocations are made to the reserves. Allocations shall be made from the reserves for the amounts determined for the payment schedules for eligible postsecondary institutions pursuant to

G.S. 116-209.83

.

Beginning with the 2023-2024 fiscal year and for each subsequent fiscal year, within the funds available, the Authority shall allocate an amount equal to the amount from the prior fiscal year for the UNC Reserve and the CC Reserve to each reserve, respectively, unless otherwise agreed to by the President of The University of North Carolina and the President of the North Carolina Community College System. Additional funds may be directed to the reserves from a Current Operations Appropriations Act in a fiscal year. The reserves established for the 2022-2023 fiscal year shall consist of the following funds:

For the UNC Reserve, the monies shall consist of the following:

An amount equal to the amount appropriated to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina for The University of North Carolina Need-Based Financial Aid Program for the 2021-2022 fiscal year.

An amount equal to the proportionate share of the appropriation for the Education Lottery Scholarship Program based on awards of financial assistance to students enrolled in The University of North Carolina from the Education Lottery Scholarship Program for the 2017-2018, 2018-2019, and 2019-2020 fiscal years.

For the CC Reserve, the monies shall consist of the following:

An amount equal to the amount appropriated to the Community Colleges System Office for the North Carolina Community College Grant Program, except for funds set aside for the targeted assistance program pursuant to

G.S. 115D-40.1

, for the 2021-2022 fiscal year.

An amount equal to the proportionate share of the appropriation for the Education Lottery Scholarship based on awards of financial assistance to students enrolled in North Carolina community colleges from the Education Lottery Scholarship Program for the 2017-2018, 2018-2019, and 2019-2020 fiscal years.

Monies in the Reserve Fund shall not revert at the end of each fiscal year but shall remain available until expended for the purposes of this Part.

The Authority may use up to one and one-half percent (1.5%) of the funds available in the Reserve Fund each fiscal year for administrative costs related to the Program. Upon a determination by the Authority that funds in excess of one percent (1%) are necessary to administer the Program, including funds necessary for one-time or recurring costs, the Authority shall consult with the President of The University of North Carolina and the President of the North Carolina Community College System at the same time the consolidated payment schedule is set pursuant to

G.S. 116-209.83

. The Authority shall also report the amount of the increase and the purpose for which the additional funds will be used to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee and the Fiscal Research Division of the General Assembly within 30 days of the increase. In no event shall the cost of administering the Program in a fiscal year exceed one and one-half percent (1.5%) of the funds available in the Reserve Fund.

History.

2021-180, s. 8A.2(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(
l
), made this Part, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.2(a), effective January 1, 2022, and applicable to scholarships awarded beginning with the 2023-2024 academic year.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§§
116-209.86 through 116-209.89.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 6.
Tuition Grant for High School Graduates of the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics and the University of North Carolina School of the Arts.

§ 116-209.90.
Tuition grants for graduates to attend a constituent institution.

Within the funds available, a high school graduate from the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics (NCSSM) or the University of North Carolina School of the Arts (UNCSA) in each school year who meets the following conditions shall be eligible for a tuition grant awarded under this Part:

Is a resident for tuition purposes under the criteria set forth in

G.S. 116-143.1

and in accordance with the coordinated and centralized residency determination process administered by the Authority.

Enrolls as a full-time student in a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina in the next academic year after graduation.

Students who receive initial tuition grants as a cohort of a high school graduating class of NCSSM or UNCSA shall also be eligible to apply for tuition grants for subsequent academic years for up to a total of four academic years. A student must be continuously enrolled in a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina after the award of the initial tuition grant to be eligible for tuition grants in subsequent academic years. The Authority shall have the discretion to waive this requirement if the student is able to demonstrate that any of the following have substantially disrupted or interrupted the student’s pursuit of a degree: (i) a military service obligation, (ii) serious medical debilitation, (iii) a short-term or long-term disability, or (iv) other extraordinary hardship.

The amount of the tuition grant to each graduate shall be determined and distributed as provided in

G.S. 116-209.91

.

History.

2021-180, s. 8A.1(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.8, made this Part, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.1(a), effective July 1, 2021.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.1(c), made this Part applicable beginning with graduates of the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics and the University of North Carolina School of the Arts from the 2020-2021 school year.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 8A.1(b), provides: “It is the intent of the General Assembly to appropriate the following additional funds for the purpose of awarding tuition grants for future high school graduating classes of the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics (NCSSM), including students graduating from the Morganton campus of NCSSM, and the University of North Carolina School of the Arts:

“(1) For the 2023-2024 fiscal year, the sum of one million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($1,750,000) in recurring funds.

“(2) For the 2024-2025 fiscal year, the sum of two million three hundred thousand dollars ($2,300,000) in recurring funds.

“(3) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the sum of five hundred fifty thousand dollars ($550,000) in recurring funds.

“(4) For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of five hundred fifty thousand dollars ($550,000) in recurring funds.

“(5) For the 2027-2028 fiscal year, the sum of five hundred fifty thousand dollars ($550,000) in recurring funds.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.5, provides: “Except for statutory changes or other provisions that clearly indicate an intention to have effects beyond the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, the textual provisions of this act apply only to funds appropriated for, and activities occurring during, the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.

§ 116-209.91.
Administration of tuition grants.

The Authority shall administer the tuition grants provided for in this Part pursuant to guidelines and procedures established by the Authority consistent with its practices for administering State-funded financial aid. The guidelines and procedures shall include an application process and schedule, notification and disbursement procedures, standards for reporting, and standards for return of tuition grants when a student withdraws. The Authority shall not approve any grant until it receives proper certification from the appropriate constituent institution that the student applying for the grant is an eligible student. Upon receipt of the certification, the Authority shall remit, at the times it prescribes, the tuition grant to the constituent institution on behalf, and to the credit, of the student. In the event a student on whose behalf a tuition grant has been paid is not enrolled and carrying a minimum academic load as of the tenth classroom day following the beginning of the school term for which the tuition grant was paid, the constituent institution shall refund the full amount of the tuition grant to the Authority.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the amount of the grant awarded to a student shall cover the tuition cost at the constituent institution in which the student is enrolled. No tuition grant awarded to a student under this section shall exceed the cost of attendance at a constituent institution for which the student is enrolled.

If a student, who is eligible for a tuition grant under this section, also receives a scholarship or other grant covering the cost of attendance at the constituent institution for which the tuition grant is awarded, then the amount of the tuition grant shall be reduced by an appropriate amount determined by the Authority so that the total amount of scholarships and grants received by the student does not exceed the cost of attendance for the institution. The cost of attendance shall be determined by the Authority for each constituent institution.

In the event there are not sufficient funds to provide each eligible student who has applied in accordance with the application process and the schedule established by the Authority with a full tuition grant as provided by this Part, each eligible student shall receive a pro rata share of funds available for the academic year covered by the appropriation in the preceding fiscal year.

The Authority may use up to five percent (5%) of the funds appropriated each year for tuition grants under this Part for administrative costs.

History.

2021-180, s. 8A.1(a).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.8, made this Part, as added by Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.1(a), effective July 1, 2021.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 8A.1(c), made this Part applicable beginning with graduates of the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics and the University of North Carolina School of the Arts from the 2020-2021 school year.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 43.7, is a severability clause.